en: Barley flours, Barley flour
ar: دقيق الشعير
bg: Ечемичено брашно
de: Gerstenmehl
es: Harinas de cebada
fr: Farines d’orge, Farine d'orge
hr: Ječmena brašna
hu: Árpa lisztek
it: Farine di orzo, farine d'orzo, Farine d'orzo, Farina d'orzo
ja: 大麦粉
ka: ქერის ფქვილი
lt: Miežių miltai
nb: byggmel
nl: Gerstemeel
pl: Mąki jęczmienne, Mąka jęczmienna
ro: făină de orz
tr: arpa unu
zh: 大麦粉

en: Barley malt flours
es: Harinas de cebada malteadas, Harinas de malta de cebada
fr: Farines de malt d’orge
hr: Brašna od ječmenog slada
hu: Árpamaláta lisztek
lt: Miežių salyklo miltai
nl: Gerstemoutmelen

en: Buckwheat flours
bg: Брашно от елда
de: Buchweizenmehle
es: Harinas de trigo sarraceno, Harinas de alforfón
fi: tattarijauhoja
fr: Farines de sarrasin, Farines de blé noir
hr: Heljdina brašna
hu: Hajdina liszt
it: Farine di grano saraceno
ja: そば粉, 蕎麦粉
lt: Grikių miltai
nl: Boekweitmelen
pl: Mąki gryczane, Mąka gryczana, Mąka z gryki

fr: Farine de blé noir de Bretagne
br: Gwinizh du Breizh
lt: Grikių miltai iš Bretanės

en: T80 buckwheat flour
fr: Farines de sarrasin T80, Farines de blé noir T80
hr: T80 heljdino brašno
lt: Grikių miltai 80D
nl: Boekweitmelen T80

en: T110 buckwheat flour
fr: Farines de sarrasin T110, Farines de blé noir T110
hr: T110 heljdino brašno
lt: Grikių miltai 110D
nl: Boekweitmelen T110

en: T150 buckwheat flour
fr: Farines de sarrasin T150, Farines de blé noir T150
hr: T150 heljdinog brašna
lt: Grikių miltai 150D
nl: Boekweitmelen T150

en: Cornmeal, Corn flours, Maize flours
bg: Царевично брашно
de: Maismehl
es: Harinas de maíz
fi: Maissijauhot
fr: Farines de maïs, farine de maïs
hr: Kukuruzno brašno
it: Farine di mais
ja: コーンミール, コーンフラワー, とうもろこし粉, トウモロコシ粉
lt: Kukurūzų miltai
nl: Maïsmeel, Maïsmelen
pl: Mąki kukurydziane, Mąka kukurydziana, Mączka kukurydziana, Mąka z kukurydzy
pt: Farinhas de milho, farinha de milho

fr: Farines de maïs bleue
nl: Blauwe maïsmelen

en: Flax seed flours, Flax flours, Linseed flours, Common flax flours
bg: Брашно от ленено семе
es: Harinas de lino, Harinas de linaza
fr: Farines de lin
hr: Brašna od sjemenki lana
it: Farine di lino
lt: Linų sėmenų miltai
nl: Lijnzaadmelen
pt: Farinhas de linhaça, farinha de linhaça

en: Gluten flours
es: Harinas de gluten
fr: Farines de gluten
hr: Glutenska brašna
lt: Glitimo miltai
nl: Glutenmelen
pl: Mąka glutenowa

en: Gofio
es: Gofio
fr: Gofio
hr: Gofio
nl: Gofio

en: Malt flours
bg: Малцово брашно
es: Harinas malteadas, Harinas de malta
fr: Farines de malt
hr: Sladna brašna
lt: Salyklo miltai
nl: Moutmelen

en: Meslin flours
es: Harinas de morcajo, Harinas de tranquillón, Harinas de mezclas de trigo y centeno
fr: Farines de méteil, Farines de blé et seigle, Mélanges de farines
hr: Meslin brašna
lt: Meslino miltai

en: Millet flours
es: Harinas de mijo
fr: Farines de millet
hr: Brašna od prosa
it: Farine di miglio
lt: Sorų miltai
nl: Gierstmelen
pt: Farinhas de milheto, farinha de milheto

en: Matza flours
es: Harinas de matzá
fr: Farines de matza
hr: Matza brašna

en: Oat flours
bg: Овесено брашно
de: Hafermehle
es: Harinas de avena
fi: Kaurajauhot
fr: Farines d'avoine, Farines d'avoines, Farine d'avoine Farines de avoines
hr: Zobena brašna
it: Farine di avena
lt: Avižiniai miltai
nl: Havermelen
pl: Mąki owsiane, Mąka owsiana, Mąka z owsa
pt: Farinhas de aveia, farinha de aveia
tr: Yulaf unu

en: Quinoa flours
bg: Брашно от киноа
de: Quinoamehle, Quinoa-Mehle
es: Harinas de quinoa
fr: Farines de quinoa
hr: Brašna od kvinoje
it: Farine di quinoa
lt: Quinoa miltai
nl: Quinoamelen
pt: Farinhas de quinoa, farinha de quinoa

en: Rice flours, Rice flour
bg: Оризово брашно
de: Reismehle
es: Harinas de arroz
fi: riisijauhot
fr: Farines de riz, farine de riz
hr: Rižino brašno
it: Farine di riso
ja: 米粉
lt: Ryžių miltai
nl: Rijstmelen
pt: Farinhas de arroz, farinha de arroz
tr: Pirinç unu

en: Rye flours
bg: Брашно от ръж
de: Roggenmehle
es: Harinas de centeno
fi: Ruisjauhot
fr: Farines de seigle
hr: Ražena brašna
it: Farine di segale
ja: ライ麦粉
lt: Ruginiai miltai
nl: Roggemelen
pl: Mąki żytnie, mąka żytnia
pt: Farinha de centeio, farinha de centeio
tr: Çavdar unu